New York, session 2025-2026, S1704.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 17-1016 of the environmental conservation law, as 2 added by chapter 505 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 17-1016. Reduction of air pollution from petroleum bulk storage facil- 4 ities. 5 1. Definitions. For purposes of this section, the terms below shall 6 have the following [meaning] meanings: 7 a. "Shell color" shall mean [the color and shade combination of the 8 paint] any coating on the sides or shell of a tank, which reduces vola- 9 tile emissions. 10 b. "Roof color" shall mean [the color and shade combination of the 11 paint] any coating on the roof of a tank, which reduces volatile emis- 12 sions. 13 c. "Tank" shall have the meaning set forth in section 17-1003 of this 14 title except that for purposes of this section "tank" means an above- 15 ground tank, unless the department determines the tank to be otherwise 16 sufficiently protected against volatilization in a manner no less 17 protective than subdivision two of this section, and does not include 18 associated pipes, lines, fixtures or other ancillary equipment. 19 2. Tank coloring. a. No person shall own or operate a facility 20 containing a tank that does not meet the color requirements of this 21 subdivision. Such color requirements shall apply to every tank at a 22 facility regardless of whether the tank is in active use for storage. 23 b. A tank shall have a shell color and roof color of either white or 24 beige/cream, or which limits volatile emissions to the same or to a 25 greater extent as a shell color and roof color of white or beige/cream, 26 as determined by the department. 27 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05486-01-5